src/bn.aff
SET UTF-8
LANG bn
FLAG long

PFX AA Y 1
PFX AA 0 অ

PFX AB Y 1
PFX AB 0 অঘা

PFX AC Y 1
PFX AD 0 অজ

PFX AD Y 1
PFX AD 0 অনা

PFX AE Y 1
PFX AE 0 আড়

PFX AF Y 1
PFX AF 0 আন

PFX AG Y 1
PFX AG 0 আব

PFX AH Y 1
PFX AH 0 ইতি

PFX AI Y 1
PFX AI 0 কদ

PFX AJ Y 1
PFX AJ 0 কু

PFX AK Y 1 
PFX AK 0 নি

PFX AL Y 1
PFX AL 0 পাতি

PFX AM Y 1
PFX AM 0 বি

PFX AN Y 1
PFX AN 0 ভর

PFX AO Y 1
PFX AO 0 রাম

PFX AP Y 1
PFX AP 0 স

PFX AQ Y 1
PFX AQ 0 সা

PFX AR Y 1
PFX AR 0 সু

PFX AS Y 1
PFX AS 0 হা

PFX AT Y 1
PFX AT 0 প্র

PFX AU Y 1
PFX AU 0 পরা

PFX AV Y 1
PFX AV 0 অপ

PFX AW Y 1
PFX AW 1 নি

PFX AZ Y 1
PFX AZ 0 অব

PFX BA Y 1
PFX BA 0 বি

PFX BB Y 1
PFX BB 0 অধি 

PFX BC Y 1
PFX BC 0 পরি

PFX BD Y 1
PFX BD 0 প্রতি

PFX BE Y 1
PFX BE 0 উপ

PFX BF Y 1
PFX BF 0 অভি

PFX BG Y 1
PFX BG 0 অতি

PFX BH Y 1
PFX BH 0 আ

PFX BI Y 1
PFX BI 0 বে

PFX BJ Y 1
PFX BJ 0 বদ

PFX BK Y 1
PFX BK 0 ব

PFX BL Y 1
PFX BL 0 খাস

PFX BM Y 1
PFX BM 0 গর

PFX BN Y 1
PFX BN 0 ফুল

PFX BO Y 1
PFX BO 0 হাফ

PFX BP Y 1
PFX BP 0 হেড

PFX BQ Y 1
PFX BQ 0 সাব

PFX BR Y 1
PFX BR 0 অকাল

PFX BS Y 1
PFX BS 0 অক্ষত

PFX BT Y 1
PFX BT 0 অনু

REP BS 2
REP ি  ী 
REP ী  ি 

SFX CA Y 83
SFX CA 0 ে
SFX CA 0 েন
SFX CA 0 িস
SFX CA 0 ি
SFX CA 0 িতেছে
SFX CA 0 েছ
SFX CA 0 িতেছেন
SFX CA 0 েছন
SFX CA 0 ছ
SFX CA 0 িতেছিস
SFX CA 0 িছ
SFX CA 0 িতেছি
SFX CA 0 িইয়াছে
SFX CA 0 েছে
SFX CA 0 িইয়াছেন
SFX CA 0 েছেন
SFX CA 0 িয়াছ
SFX CA 0 িয়াছিস
SFX CA 0 েছিস
SFX CA 0 িয়াছি
SFX CA 0 েছি
SFX CA 0 ুক
SFX CA 0 ুন
SFX CA 0 ো
SFX CA 0 িল
SFX CA 0 ল
SFX CA 0 িলেন
SFX CA 0 িলে
SFX CA 0 লে
SFX CA 0 িলি
SFX CA 0 িলাম
SFX CA 0 লাম
SFX CA 0 লুম
SFX CA 0 িত
SFX CA 0 তে
SFX CA 0 তো
SFX CA 0 িতেন
SFX CA 0 তেন
SFX CA 0 িতে
SFX CA 0 তে
SFX CA 0 িতিস
SFX CA 0 তিস
SFX CA 0 িতাম
SFX CA 0 তাম
SFX CA 0 িতেছিলো
SFX CA 0 ছিল
SFX CA 0 ছিলেন
SFX CA 0 িতেছিলে
SFX CA 0 ছিলে
SFX CA 0 িতেছিলি
SFX CA 0 িতেছিলাম
SFX CA 0 ছিলাম
SFX CA 0 িয়াছিলো
SFX CA 0 েছিল
SFX CA 0 িইয়াছিলেন
SFX CA 0 েছিলেন
SFX CA 0 েছিলে
SFX CA 0 েছিলি
SFX CA 0 িয়াছিলাম
SFX CA 0 েছিলুম
SFX CA 0 িবে
SFX CA 0 বে
SFX CA 0 িবেন
SFX CA 0 িবি
SFX CA 0 বো
SFX CA 0 িতে থাকিবে
SFX CA 0 তে থাকিবো
SFX CA 0 িতে থাকিবেন
SFX CA 0 তে থাকবেন
SFX CA 0 িতে থাকবে
SFX CA 0 িতে থাকিবি
SFX CA 0 িতে থাকব
SFX CA 0 িয়া থাকবে
SFX CA 0 ে থাকবে
SFX CA 0 িয়া থাকবে
SFX CA 0 িয়া থাকিবি
SFX CA 0 িবে
SFX CA 0 বে
SFX CA 0 িবেন
SFX CA 0 বেন
SFX CA 0 িও
SFX CA 0 ও
SFX CA 0 িস

SFX CB Y 4
SFX CB 0 টা
SFX CB 0 টি
SFX CB 0 খানা
SFX CB 0 খানি

SFX CC Y 2
SFX CC 0 রা
SFX CC 0 েরা

SFX CD Y 2
SFX CD 0 গুলো
SFX CD 0 গুলি

SFX CE Y 1
SFX CE 0 গন

SFX CF Y 1
SFX CF 0 গুচ্ছ

SFX CG Y 1
SFX CG 0 মণ্ডল

SFX CH Y 1
SFX CH 0 মালা

SFX CI Y 1
SFX CI 0 রাশি

SFX CJ Y 1
SFX CJ 0 শ্রেণি

SFX CK Y 1
SFX CK 0 সমূহ

SFX CL Y 1
SFX CL 0 বৃন্দ

SFX CM Y 1                                     
SFX CM 0 কে

SFX CN Y 1                                     
SFX CN 0 যোগ্য

SFX CO Y 1                                     
SFX CO 0 ীয়

SFX CP Y 1                                     
SFX CP 0 কর 

SFX CQ Y 1                                     
SFX CQ 0 ে 

SFX CR Y 1                                     
SFX CR 0 ের

SFX CS Y 1                                     
SFX CS 0  সহ  

SFX CT Y 1                                     
SFX CT 0 ী
